Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.560

Personal liability of conservator.

(1) Except as otherwise agreed by a conservator, the conservator is not personally liable on a contract properly entered into in a fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the conservatorship estate unless the conservator fails to reveal the conservator's representative capacity in the contract or before entering into the contract.

(2) A conservator is personally liable for an obligation arising from control of property of the conservatorship estate or an act or omission occurring in the course of administration of the conservatorship estate only if the conservator is personally at fault.

(3) A claim based on a contract entered into by a conservator in a fiduciary capacity, an obligation arising from control of property included in the conservatorship estate, or a tort committed in the course of administration of the conservatorship estate may be asserted against the conservatorship estate in a proceeding against the conservator in a fiduciary capacity, whether or not the conservator is personally liable for the claim.

(4) A question of liability between a conservatorship estate and the conservator personally may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge, or indemnification or another appropriate proceeding or action.

[ 2019 c 437 s 429.]